Missouri, session 2026, SB998.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 166.700 and 166.720, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 166.700, 166.719, and 166.720, to read as
follows:
166.700. As used in sections 166.700 to 166.720, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Curriculum", a complete course of study for a
particular content area or grade level, including any
supplemental materials;
(2) "District", the same meaning as used in section
160.011;
(3) "Educational assistance organization", the same
meaning as used in section 135.712;
(4) ["Illegal alien", any person who is not lawfully
present in the United States or any person who gained
illegal entry into the United States] "Legal resident", any
person who is lawfully present in the United States,
according to the terms of 8 U.S.C. Section 1101, et seq.;
(5) "Parent", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS SB 998 2
(6) "Private school", a school that is not a part of
the public school system of the state of Missouri and that
charges tuition for the rendering of elementary or secondary
educational services;
(7) "Program", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
(8) "Qualified school", an FPE school or any of the
following entities that is incorporated in Missouri and that
does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, or
national origin:
(a) A charter school as defined in section 160.400;
(b) A private school;
(c) A public school as defined in section 160.011; or
(d) A public or private virtual school;
(9) "Qualified student", any elementary or secondary
school student who is a legal resident of this state[, who
is not an illegal alien,] and who:
(a) Has an approved "individualized education plan"
(IEP) developed under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et
seq., as amended, in accordance with rules of the state
board of education or with the applicable rules of another
state, or who has been diagnosed with dyslexia, as the term
"dyslexia" is defined in section 633.420, or who has
received a diagnosis of a disability from a physician who is
licensed under the provisions of chapter 332, a psychologist
who is licensed under the provisions of chapter 337, or a
mental health professional as defined in section 632.005,
while acting within their scope of practice, or a physician
who holds an active license issued by another state or
territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; or

SCS SB 998 3
(b) Is a member of a household whose total annual
income does not exceed an amount equal to three hundred
percent of the income standard used to qualify for free and
reduced price lunches[, and that meets at least one of the
following qualifications:
a. Attended a public school as a full-time student for
at least one semester during the previous twelve months;
b. Is a child who is eligible to begin kindergarten or
first grade under sections 160.051 to 160.055; or
c. Is a sibling of a qualified student who received a
scholarship grant in the previous school year and will
receive a scholarship grant in the current school year].
166.719. 1. For purposes of this section, "parents"
includes only those parents, as the term "parent" is defined
in section 166.700, whose children are qualified students
who participate in or have applied to participate in the
program.
2. An organization may intervene on behalf of a group
of parents as a defendant in any action in which any of the
following is at issue:
(1) Any provision of the Constitution of Missouri
involving the program;
(2) Any Missouri statute involving the program; or
(3) Any Missouri regulation involving the program.
3. An organization that intervenes on behalf of a
group of parents under this section shall represent the
rights of such parents in such proceeding and shall have the
right to file such pleading necessary on behalf of such
parents.
166.720. 1. Sections 166.700 to 166.720 shall not be
construed to permit any governmental agency to exercise
control or supervision over any qualified school in which a

SCS SB 998 4
qualified student enrolls other than a qualified school that
is a public school.
2. A qualified school, other than a qualified school
that is a public school, that accepts a payment from a
parent under sections 166.700 to 166.720 shall not be
considered an agent of the state or federal government due
to its acceptance of the payment.
3. A qualified school shall not be required to alter
its creed, practices, admissions policy, or curriculum in
order to accept students whose parents pay tuition or fees
from a Missouri empowerment scholarship account to
participate as a qualified school.
4. (1) Except as specifically provided in state law,
a qualified school shall not be required to be accredited by
any entity in order to participate in the program by
enrolling qualified students and receiving funds remitted
from such students' empowerment scholarship accounts. This
subdivision applies to accreditation by entities that may
include, but shall not be limited to, the department of
elementary and secondary education or a nationally
recognized education accrediting association.
(2) Except as specifically provided in state law, a
qualified school shall not be required to comply with any
rule, regulation, or other criteria or requirement in order
to participate in the program by enrolling qualified
students and receiving funds remitted from such students'
empowerment scholarship accounts.
(3) Neither the state treasurer nor the Missouri
empowerment scholarship accounts board shall establish or
enforce any rule, regulation, or other criteria or
requirement that conditions a qualified school's eligibility
to participate in the program on:

SCS SB 998 5
(a) Accreditation in violation of subdivision (1) of
this subsection; or
(b) Compliance with any rule, regulation, or other
criteria or requirement in violation of subdivision (2) of
this subsection.
(4) Any rule, regulation, or other criteria or
requirement that violates any provision of this subsection
is void and shall have no force or effect.
5. (1) Any qualified student receiving a Missouri
empowerment scholarship who leaves a public school or
charter school, as such terms are defined in chapter 160, in
the qualified student's resident school district to enroll
in a qualified school that is not the qualified student's
resident school district shall continue to be counted in the
resident public school or charter school's weighted average
daily attendance as a resident student for the purposes of
determining state and federal aid for the qualified
student's resident school district or charter school.
(2) The qualified student will continue to be counted
for such purpose as provided:
(a) For five years after the qualified student no
longer attends school in the qualified student's resident
school district;
(b) Until any calendar year that the qualified student
no longer receives grant money in their scholarship account;
(c) Until the qualified student is counted in the
weighted average daily attendance for a public school or
charter that they are a resident student in; or
(d) Until the qualified student graduates.
(3) The educational assistance organization and the
state treasurer shall provide the necessary information to
the department of elementary and secondary education to

SCS SB 998 6
allow the federal and state aid to continue to the public
school or charter school in the qualified student's resident
school district previously attended by the qualified student.
(4) The provisions of this subsection shall terminate
five years after August 28, 2021.
[5.] 6. In any legal proceeding challenging the
application of sections 166.700 to 166.720 to a qualified
school, the state shall bear the burden of establishing that
the law is necessary and does not impose any undue burden on
qualified schools.
[6.] 7. The provisions of section 23.253 of the
Missouri sunset act shall not apply to sections 166.700 to
166.720.
✓